Florida, session 2026, SB7026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 119.0715, Florida Statutes, is amended 17 to read: 18 119.0715âTrade secrets held by an agency.â 19 (1)âDEFINITION.ââTrade secretâ has the same meaning as in 20 s. 688.002. 21 (2)âPUBLIC RECORD EXEMPTION.âA trade secret held by an 22 agency is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 23 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 24 (3)âAGENCY ACCESS.âAn agency may disclose a trade secret to 25 an officer or employee of another agency or governmental entity 26 whose use of the trade secret is within the scope of his or her 27 lawful duties and responsibilities. 28 (4)âLIABILITY.âAn agency employee who, while acting in good 29 faith and in the performance of his or her duties, releases a 30 record containing a trade secret pursuant to this chapter is not 31 liable, civilly or criminally, for such release. 32 (5)âOPEN GOVERNMENT SUNSET REVIEW.âThis section is subject 33 to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 34 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless 35 reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 36 Legislature. 37 Section 2.âParagraph (d) of subsection (8) of section 38 287.137, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 39 287.137âAntitrust violations; denial or revocation of the 40 right to transact business with public entities; denial of 41 economic benefits.â 42 (8) 43 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âproprietary 44 business informationâ means information that: 45 1.âIs owned or controlled by the business; 46 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the business 47 as private because disclosure would harm the business or its 48 business operations; 49 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 50 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 51 released to the public; 52 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 53 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 54 same configuration as received by the Attorney General; and 55 5.âIncludes: 56 a.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 57 b.âcompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 58 impair the competitive advantage of the business that is the 59 subject of the information. 60 Section 3.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) and subsection 61 (3) of section 288.075, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 62 288.075âConfidentiality of records.â 63 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 64 (c)ââTrade secretâ has the same meaning as in s. 688.002. 65 (3)âTRADE SECRETS.âTrade secrets held by an economic 66 development agency are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 67 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 68 Section 4.âSection 334.049, Florida Statutes, is amended to 69 read: 70 334.049âPatents, copyrights, trademarks; notice to 71 Department of State; confidentiality of trade secrets.â 72 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law to the 73 contrary, the Department of Transportation is authorized, in its 74 own name, to: 75 (a)âPerform all things necessary to secure letters of 76 patent, copyrights, and trademarks on any legitimately acquired 77 work products, and to enforce its rights therein. 78 (b)âLicense, lease, assign, or otherwise give written 79 consent to any person, firm, or corporation for the manufacture 80 or use of any product protected by patent, copyright, or 81 trademark, whether on a royalty basis or for such other 82 consideration as the department may deem proper. 83 (c)âTake any action necessary, including legal action, to 84 enforce its rights under any agreement and to protect its 85 property rights from improper or unlawful use or infringement. 86 (d)âEnforce the collection of any payments or other 87 obligations due the department for the manufacture or use of any 88 product by any other party. 89 (e)âSell any product, except where otherwise provided by 90 public records laws, which the department may create or cause to 91 be created, whether or not the product is protected by a 92 department patent, copyright, or trademark, and to execute all 93 instruments necessary to consummate any such sale. 94 (f)âDo all other acts necessary and proper for the 95 execution of powers and duties herein conferred upon the 96 department. 97 (2)âThe department shall notify the Department of State in 98 writing whenever property rights by patent, copyright, or 99 trademark are secured or exploited by the department. 100 (3)âAny proceeds from the sale of products or the right to 101 manufacture or use a product must shall be deposited in the 102 State Transportation Trust Fund and may be appropriated to 103 finance activities of the department. The departmentâs 104 legislative budget request should give special consideration to 105 using such funds for research and development projects. 106 (4)âAny information obtained by the department as a result 107 of research and development projects and revealing a method of 108 process, production, or manufacture which is a trade secret as 109 defined in s. 688.002, is confidential and exempt from the 110 provisions of s. 119.07(1). 111 (5)âAs used in this section the term âproductâ includes any 112 and all inventions, methodologies, techniques, and creations 113 that may be properly protected by patent, copyright, or 114 trademark. 115 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 408.185, Florida 116 Statutes, is amended to read: 117 408.185âInformation submitted for review of antitrust 118 issues; confidentiality.âThe following information held by the 119 Office of the Attorney General, which is submitted by a member 120 of the health care community pursuant to a request for an 121 antitrust no-action letter shall be confidential and exempt from 122 the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 123 Constitution for 1 year after the date of submission. 124 (1)âDocuments that reveal trade secrets as defined in s. 125 688.002. 126 Section 6.âSection 409.91196, Florida Statutes, is amended 127 to read: 128 409.91196âSupplemental rebate agreements; public records 129 and public meetings exemption.â 130 (1)âThe rebate amount, percent of rebate, manufacturerâs 131 pricing, and supplemental rebate information, and other trade 132 secrets as defined in s. 688.002 that the agency has identified 133 for use in negotiations, held by the Agency for Health Care 134 Administration under s. 409.912(5)(a)7. are confidential and 135 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 136 Constitution. 137 (2)âThat portion of a meeting of the Medicaid 138 Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee at which the rebate 139 amount, percent of rebate, manufacturerâs pricing, or 140 supplemental rebate information, or other trade secrets as 141 defined in s. 688.002 that the agency has identified for use in 142 negotiations, are discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 143 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. A record shall be made 144 of each exempt portion of a meeting. Such record must include 145 the times of commencement and termination, all discussions and 146 proceedings, the names of all persons present at any time, and 147 the names of all persons speaking. No exempt portion of a 148 meeting may be held off the record. 149 Section 7.âSubsection (2) of section 440.108, Florida 150 Statutes, is amended to read: 151 440.108âInvestigatory records relating to workersâ 152 compensation employer compliance; confidentiality.â 153 (2)âAfter an investigation is completed or ceases to be 154 active, information in records relating to the investigation 155 remains confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 156 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution if 157 disclosure of that information would: 158 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 159 investigation; 160 (b)âReveal a trade secret, as defined in s. 688.002; 161 (c)âReveal business or personal financial information; 162 (c)(d)âReveal personal identifying information regarding 163 the identity of a confidential source; 164 (d)(e)âDefame or cause unwarranted damage to the good name 165 or reputation of an individual or jeopardize the safety of an 166 individual; or 167 (e)(f)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 168 Section 8.âSubsection (4) of section 497.172, Florida 169 Statutes, is amended to read: 170 497.172âPublic records exemptions; public meetings 171 exemptions.â 172 (4)âTRADE SECRETS.âTrade secrets, as defined in s. 688.002, 173 held by the department or board, are confidential and exempt 174 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 175 Constitution. 176 Section 9.âParagraph (d) of subsection (11) of section 177 501.171, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 178 501.171âSecurity of confidential personal information.â 179 (11)âPUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.â 180 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âproprietary 181 informationâ means information that: 182 1.âIs owned or controlled by the covered entity. 183 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the covered 184 entity as private because disclosure would harm the covered 185 entity or its business operations. 186 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 187 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 188 released to the public. 189 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 190 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 191 same configuration as received by the department. 192 5.âIncludes: 193 a.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 194 b.âcompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 195 impair the competitive business of the covered entity who is the 196 subject of the information. 197 Section 10.âParagraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 198 501.1735, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 199 501.1735âProtection of children in online spaces; public 200 records exemption.â 201 (6)âPUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.â 202 (d)âFor purposes of this section, the term âproprietary 203 informationâ means information that: 204 1.âIs owned or controlled by the online platform. 205 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the online 206 platform as private because disclosure would harm the online 207 platform or its business operations. 208 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 209 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 210 released to the public. 211 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 212 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 213 same configuration as received by the department. 214 5.âIncludes: 215 a.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 216 b.âcompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 217 impair the competitive advantage of the online platform who is 218 the subject of the information. 219 Section 11.âParagraph (d) of subsection (10) of section 220 501.2041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 221 501.2041âUnlawful acts and practices by social media 222 platforms.â 223 (10) 224 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âproprietary 225 business informationâ means information that: 226 1.âIs owned or controlled by the business; 227 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the business 228 as private because disclosure would harm the business or its 229 business operations; 230 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 231 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 232 released to the public; 233 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 234 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 235 same configuration as received by the department; and 236 5.âIncludes: 237 a.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 238 b.âcompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 239 impair the competitive advantage of the business that is the 240 subject of the information. 241 Section 12.âParagraph (e) of subsection (4) of section 242 501.722, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 243 501.722âPublic records exemption.â 244 (4)âFor purposes of this section, the term âproprietary 245 informationâ means information that: 246 (e)âIncludes: 247 1.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 248 2.âcompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 249 impair the competitive advantage of the controller, processor, 250 or third party who is the subject of the information. 251 Section 13.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 252 520.9965, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 253 520.9965âConfidentiality of information relating to 254 investigations and examinations.â 255 (1) 256 (b)âExcept as necessary for the office to enforce the 257 provisions of this chapter, a consumer complaint and other 258 information relative to an investigation or examination shall 259 remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) after the 260 investigation or examination is completed or ceases to be active 261 to the extent disclosure would: 262 1.âJeopardize the integrity of another active investigation 263 or examination. 264 2.âReveal the name, address, telephone number, social 265 security number, or any other identifying number or information 266 of any complainant, customer, or account holder. 267 3.âDisclose the identity of a confidential source. 268 4.âDisclose investigative techniques or procedures. 269 5.âReveal a trade secret as defined in s. 688.002. 270 Section 14.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 271 548.062, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 272 548.062âPublic records exemption.â 273 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âproprietary 274 confidential business informationâ means information that: 275 (e)âConcerns any of the following: 276 1.âThe number of ticket sales for a match; 277 2.âThe amount of gross receipts after a match; 278 3.âA trade secret, as defined in s. 688.002; 279 4.âBusiness plans; 280 4.5.âInternal auditing controls and reports of internal 281 auditors; or 282 5.6.âReports of external auditors. 283 Section 15.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 284 559.5558, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 285 559.5558âPublic records exemption; investigations and 286 examinations.â 287 (2) 288 (b)âInformation made confidential and exempt pursuant to 289 this section is no longer confidential and exempt once the 290 investigation or examination is completed or ceases to be active 291 unless disclosure of the information would: 292 1.âJeopardize the integrity of another active investigation 293 or examination. 294 2.âReveal the personal identifying information of a 295 consumer, unless the consumer is also the complainant. A 296 complainantâs personal identifying information is subject to 297 disclosure after the investigation or examination is completed 298 or ceases to be active. However, a complainantâs personal 299 financial and health information remains confidential and 300 exempt. 301 3.âReveal the identity of a confidential source. 302 4.âReveal investigative or examination techniques or 303 procedures. 304 5.âReveal trade secrets, as defined in s. 688.002. 305 Section 16.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 306 569.215, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 307 569.215âConfidential records relating to tobacco settlement 308 agreement.â 309 (2)âAs used in this section, the term âproprietary 310 confidential business informationâ means information, regardless 311 of form or characteristics, which is owned or controlled by a 312 tobacco company that is a signatory to the settlement agreement, 313 as amended, in the case of State of Florida v. American Tobacco 314 Company, No. 95-1466AH, in the Circuit Court of the Fifteenth 315 Judicial Circuit, in and for Palm Beach County, is intended to 316 be and is treated by a tobacco company as private in that the 317 disclosure of the information would cause harm to the companyâs 318 business operations, and has not been disclosed unless disclosed 319 pursuant to a statutory provision, an order of a court or 320 administrative body, or private agreement that provides that the 321 information will not be released to the public. The term 322 includes, but is not limited to: 323 (a)âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 324 Section 17.âSection 627.0628, Florida Statutes, is amended 325 to read: 326 627.0628âFlorida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection 327 Methodology; public records exemption; public meetings 328 exemption.â 329 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 330 (a)âReliable projections of hurricane losses are necessary 331 in order to assure that rates for residential property insurance 332 meet the statutory requirement that rates be neither excessive 333 nor inadequate. The ability to accurately project hurricane 334 losses has been enhanced greatly in recent years through the use 335 of computer modeling. It is the public policy of this state to 336 encourage the use of the most sophisticated actuarial methods to 337 assure that consumers are charged lawful rates for residential 338 property insurance coverage. 339 (b)âThe Legislature recognizes the need for expert 340 evaluation of computer models and other recently developed or 341 improved actuarial methodologies for projecting hurricane 342 losses, in order to resolve conflicts among actuarial 343 professionals, and in order to provide both immediate and 344 continuing improvement in the sophistication of actuarial 345 methods used to set rates charged to consumers. 346 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to create the 347 Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology as a 348 panel of experts to provide the most actuarially sophisticated 349 guidelines and standards for projection of hurricane losses 350 possible, given the current state of actuarial science. It is 351 the further intent of the Legislature that such standards and 352 guidelines must be used by the State Board of Administration in 353 developing reimbursement premium rates for the Florida Hurricane 354 Catastrophe Fund, and, subject to paragraph (3)(d), must be used 355 by insurers in rate filings under s. 627.062 unless the way in 356 which such standards and guidelines were applied by the insurer 357 was erroneous, as shown by a preponderance of the evidence. 358 (d)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that such standards 359 and guidelines be employed as soon as possible, and that they be 360 subject to continuing review thereafter. 361 (e)âThe Legislature finds that the authority to take final 362 agency action with respect to insurance ratemaking is vested in 363 the Office of Insurance Regulation and the Financial Services 364 Commission, and that the processes, standards, and guidelines of 365 the Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology 366 do not constitute final agency action or statements of general 367 applicability that implement, interpret, or prescribe law or 368 policy; accordingly, chapter 120 does not apply to the 369 processes, standards, and guidelines of the Florida Commission 370 on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology. 371 (2)âCOMMISSION CREATED.â 372 (a)âThere is created the Florida Commission on Hurricane 373 Loss Projection Methodology, which is assigned to the State 374 Board of Administration. For the purposes of this section, the 375 term âcommissionâ means the Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss 376 Projection Methodology. The commission shall be administratively 377 housed within the State Board of Administration, but it shall 378 independently exercise the powers and duties specified in this 379 section. 380 (b)âThe commission shall be composed consist of the 381 following 12 members: 382 1.âThe insurance consumer advocate. 383 2.âThe senior employee of the State Board of Administration 384 responsible for operations of the Florida Hurricane Catastrophe 385 Fund. 386 3.âThe Executive Director of the Citizens Property 387 Insurance Corporation or the executive directorâs designee. The 388 executive directorâs designee must be a full-time employee of 389 the corporation and have actuarial science experience. 390 4.âThe Director of the Division of Emergency Management or 391 the directorâs designee. The directorâs designee must be a full 392 time employee of the division. 393 5.âThe actuary member of the Florida Hurricane Catastrophe 394 Fund Advisory Council. 395 6.âAn employee of the office who is an actuary responsible 396 for property insurance rate filings and who is appointed by the 397 director of the office. 398 7.âFive members appointed by the Chief Financial Officer, 399 as follows: 400 a.âAn actuary who is employed full time by a property and 401 casualty insurer that was responsible for at least 1 percent of 402 the aggregate statewide direct written premium for homeowner 403 insurance in the calendar year preceding the memberâs 404 appointment to the commission. 405 b.âAn expert in insurance finance who is a full-time member 406 of the faculty of the State University System and who has a 407 background in actuarial science. 408 c.âAn expert in statistics who is a full-time member of the 409 faculty of the State University System and who has a background 410 in insurance. 411 d.âAn expert in computer system design who is a full-time 412 member of the faculty of the State University System. 413 e.âAn expert in meteorology who is a full-time member of 414 the faculty of the State University System and who specializes 415 in hurricanes. 416 8.âA licensed professional structural engineer who is a 417 full-time faculty member in the State University System and who 418 has expertise in wind mitigation techniques. This appointment 419 shall be made by the Governor. 420 (c)âMembers designated under subparagraphs (b)1.-5. shall 421 serve on the commission as long as they maintain the respective 422 offices designated in subparagraphs (b)1.-5. The member 423 appointed by the director of the office under subparagraph (b)6. 424 shall serve on the commission until the end of the term of 425 office of the director who appointed him or her, unless removed 426 earlier by the director for cause. Members appointed by the 427 Chief Financial Officer under subparagraph (b)7. shall serve on 428 the commission until the end of the term of office of the Chief 429 Financial Officer who appointed them, unless earlier removed by 430 the Chief Financial Officer for cause. Vacancies on the 431 commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original 432 appointment. 433 (d)âThe State Board of Administration shall annually 434 appoint one of the members of the commission to serve as chair. 435 (e)âMembers of the commission shall serve without 436 compensation, but shall be reimbursed for per diem and travel 437 expenses pursuant to s. 112.061. 438 (f)âThe State Board of Administration shall, as a cost of 439 administration of the Florida Hurricane Catastrophe Fund, 440 provide for travel, expenses, and staff support for the 441 commission. 442 (g)âThere shall be no liability on the part of, and no 443 cause of action of any nature shall arise against, any member of 444 the commission, any member of the State Board of Administration, 445 or any employee of the State Board of Administration for any 446 action taken in the performance of their duties under this 447 section. In addition, the commission may, in writing, waive any 448 potential cause of action for negligence of a consultant, 449 contractor, or contract employee engaged to assist the 450 commission. 451 (3)âADOPTION AND EFFECT OF STANDARDS AND GUIDELINES.â 452 (a)âThe commission shall consider any actuarial methods, 453 principles, standards, models, or output ranges that have the 454 potential for improving the accuracy of or reliability of the 455 hurricane loss projections used in residential property 456 insurance rate filings and flood loss projections used in rate 457 filings for personal lines residential flood insurance coverage. 458 The commission shall, from time to time, adopt findings as to 459 the accuracy or reliability of particular methods, principles, 460 standards, models, or output ranges. 461 (b)âThe commission shall consider any actuarial methods, 462 principles, standards, or models that have the potential for 463 improving the accuracy of or reliability of projecting probable 464 maximum loss levels. The commission shall adopt findings as to 465 the accuracy or reliability of particular methods, principles, 466 standards, or models related to probable maximum loss 467 calculations. 468 (c)âIn establishing reimbursement premiums for the Florida 469 Hurricane Catastrophe Fund, the State Board of Administration 470 must, to the extent feasible, employ actuarial methods, 471 principles, standards, models, or output ranges found by the 472 commission to be accurate or reliable. 473 (d)âWith respect to a rate filing under s. 627.062, an 474 insurer shall employ and may not modify or adjust actuarial 475 methods, principles, standards, models, or output ranges found 476 by the commission to be accurate or reliable in determining 477 hurricane loss factors and probable maximum loss levels for use 478 in a rate filing under s. 627.062. An insurer may employ a model 479 in a rate filing until 120 days after the expiration of the 480 commissionâs acceptance of that model and may not modify or 481 adjust models found by the commission to be accurate or reliable 482 in determining probable maximum loss levels. This paragraph does 483 not prohibit an insurer from using a straight average of model 484 results or output ranges for the purposes of a rate filing for 485 personal lines residential flood insurance coverage under s. 486 627.062. 487 (e)âThe commission shall adopt actuarial methods, 488 principles, standards, models, or output ranges for personal 489 lines residential flood loss no later than July 1, 2017. 490 (f)âThe commission shall revise previously adopted 491 actuarial methods, principles, standards, models, or output 492 ranges every odd-numbered year for hurricane loss projections. 493 The commission shall revise previously adopted actuarial 494 methods, principles, standards, models, or output ranges no less 495 than every 4 years for flood loss projections. 496 (g)1.âA trade secret, as defined in s. 688.002, which is 497 used in designing and constructing a hurricane or flood loss 498 model and which is provided pursuant to this section, by a 499 private company, to the commission, office, or consumer advocate 500 appointed pursuant to s. 627.0613 is confidential and exempt 501 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 502 Constitution. 503 2.a.âThat portion of a meeting of the commission or of a 504 rate proceeding on an insurerâs rate filing at which a trade 505 secret as defined in s. 688.002, which is used in designing and 506 constructing a hurricane or flood loss model and which is 507 provided pursuant to this section by a private company to the 508 commission, office, or consumer advocate appointed pursuant to 509 s. 627.0613, made confidential and exempt by this paragraph is 510 discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the 511 State Constitution. The closed meeting must be recorded, and no 512 portion of the closed meeting may be off the record. 513 2.b.âThe recording of a closed portion of a meeting is 514 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 515 Constitution. 516 Section 18.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) and subsection 517 (4) of section 1004.4472, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 518 1004.4472âFlorida Institute for Human and Machine 519 Cognition, Inc.; public records exemption; public meetings 520 exemption.â 521 (2)âThe following information held by the corporation or 522 its subsidiary is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 523 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 524 (a)âMaterial relating to methods of manufacture or 525 production, potential trade secrets, patentable material, actual 526 trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002 or proprietary 527 information received, generated, ascertained, or discovered 528 during the course of research conducted by or through the 529 corporation or a subsidiary, and business transactions resulting 530 from such research. 531 (4)âThat portion of a meeting of the corporation or a 532 subsidiary at which information is presented or discussed which 533 is confidential and exempt pursuant to subsection (2) or s. 534 119.0715 is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the 535 State Constitution. 536 Section 19.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.